Washington statutes.
RCW 11.28.220

Persons disqualified as sureties.

No judge of the superior court, no sheriff, clerk of a court, or deputy of either, and no attorney-at-law shall be taken as surety on any bond required to be taken in any proceeding in probate.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.28.220. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 71; RRS s 1441; prior: 1891 p 383 s 14; Code 1881 s 1409; 1863 p 221 s 128; 1860 p 183 s 95.]